Washington statutes.
RCW 10.97.120

Criminal penalties—Civil action not affected.

Violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a misdemeanor, and any person whether as principal, agent, officer, or director for himself or herself or for another person, or for any firm or corporation, public or private, or any municipality who or which shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for each single violation. Any criminal prosecution shall not affect the right of any person to bring a civil action as authorized by this chapter or otherwise authorized by law.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1095; 1977 ex.s. c 314 s 12.]